Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Chapter 3. Election Districts, Precincts, and Polling Places.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 395, provides: “Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 3 (§

24.2-300

et seq.) of Title 24.2 of the Code of Virginia to the contrary, all references in said Chapter 3 shall be interpreted to refer to the boundaries of York County and the City of Newport News in existence on January 1, 2008. That territory transferred from the City of Newport News to York County by boundary adjustment effective July 1, 2007, shall be included in the First Congressional District, Third Senatorial District, and Ninety-sixth House of Delegates District. Of that territory transferred from York County to the City of Newport News by boundary adjustment effective July 1, 2007, the part bounded by the previous York County-City of Newport News boundary line, Fort Eustis Boulevard, and Richneck Road shall be included in the Third Congressional District, Third Senatorial District, and Ninety-third House of Delegates District. Said territory is comprised of the 2000 census blocks 511990503012010, 511990503012011, 511990503012012, and 511990503012013. All other territory transferred to the City of Newport News by said boundary adjustment shall be included in the First Congressional District, First Senatorial District, and Ninety-third House of Delegates District.”

Acts 2008, c. 395 was subject to preclearance by the Department of Justice, pursuant to section 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received June 26, 2008.